Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.870

Faculty tenure—For certain educational programs operated in state correctional institutions.

The district board of trustees of any college district currently operating an educational program with funds provided by another state agency, including federal funds, which program has been in existence for five or more years under the administration of one or more college districts, shall provide for the award or denial of tenure to anyone who holds a special faculty appointment in such curricular program and for as long as the program continues to be funded in such manner, utilizing the prescribed probationary processes and procedures set forth in this chapter with the exception that no student representative shall be required to serve on the review committee defined in RCW 28B.50.851: PROVIDED, That such review processes and procedures shall not be applicable to faculty members whose contracts are renewed after *the effective date of this 1977 amendatory act and who have completed at least three consecutive years of satisfactory full time service in such program, who shall be granted tenure by the college district: PROVIDED FURTHER, That faculty members who have completed one year or more of satisfactory full time service in such program shall be credited with such service for the purposes of this section: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That provisions relating to tenure for faculty under the provisions of this section shall be distinct from provisions relating to tenure for other faculty of the college district and faculty appointed to such special curricular program shall be treated as a separate unit as respects selection, retention, reduction in force or dismissal hereunder: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the provisions of this section shall only be applicable to faculty holding a special faculty appointment in an educational program operated in a state correctional institution pursuant to a written contract with a college district.

[ 1991 c 238 s 71; 1977 ex.s. c 282 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Phrase "the effective date of this 1977 amendatory act": Except for RCW 28B.50.100 and 28B.50.101 which were effective January 1, 1978, (see note following RCW 28B.50.100) the effective date of 1977 ex.s. c 282 (the enactment of RCW 28B.50.870, 28B.50.090, 28B.50.140, 28B.50.300, and 28B.50.860 and the repeal of RCW 28B.50.570, 28B.50.590, 28B.50.750, and 28B.56.060) was September 21, 1977.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 282: "If any provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 282 s 10.]